New Jersey, session 222, A5140.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Legislature finds and declares: a.  New Jersey has made significant strides to ensure that older adults age with dignity and independence by enrolling in the AARP network of age-friendly states and supporting the growth of age-friendly communities and projects. b.  Currently, there are more than two million individuals over the age of 60 years old living in New Jersey, and an estimated 25 percent of the States population will turn 60 years or older by 2034.  Consequently, the aging of the population impacts every aspect of New Jerseys government and economy. c.  Older New Jerseyans across the State contribute to the health and vibrancy of their communities, and the implementation of coordinated actions and policies across both the public and private sectors in New Jersey can help to meet the evolving needs of older New Jerseyans as the States population ages. d.  Therefore, it is in the best interest of the State to provide older New Jerseyans with access to a broad range of public and private programs, resources, and informal supports by implementing a multi-sector plan with clear and measurable objectives to promote healthy, and  purposeful aging and improve the quality of life for older adults. 2.  a.  There is established the Task Force on the Development and Implementation of a Multi-Sector Plan for Aging in the Department of Human Services.  The task force shall consist of 27 members as follows: (1) the Attorney General, the Commissioners of Agriculture, Banking and Insurance, Community Affairs, Health, Human Services, Labor and Workforce Development, Transportation, Veterans Affairs, the Director of the Office of Aging Services, and New Jersey Long-Term Ombudsman, or their designees, who shall serve ex officio; (2) two members of the public, one of whom shall be appointed by the Governor upon recommendation of the President of the Senate, one of whom shall be appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate which public members shall be any of the following: a gerontologist, or a physician licensed to practice in this State with expertise in providing care to elderly patients, or a person with experience in providing services to meet the physical or social needs of older persons; (3) two members of the public, one of whom shall be appointed by the Governor upon recommendation of the Speaker of the General Assembly, and one of whom shall be appointed by the Minority Leader of the General Assembly which public members shall be any of the following: a gerontologist, or a physician licensed to practice in this State with expertise in providing care to elderly patients, or a person with experience in providing services to meet the physical or social needs of older adults; and (4) 12 members of the public to be appointed by the Governor, ten of whom shall have a demonstrated interest in issues relating to aging; one of whom shall be a person who has participated in programs and received services directed at older adults; and one of whom shall be a caregiver or care partner for an older adult. (5) To the extent practicable and consistent with State and federal law, the membership of the task force shall reflect the racial, ethnic, and gender diversity of the State. b.  Public members of the task force shall serve for a term of three years, except that of the initial appointments, five public members shall serve for one year, five public members shall serve for two years, and six public members shall serve for three years. Vacancies in the membership of the task force shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments were made.  The public members of the task force shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for traveling and other miscellaneous expenses necessary to perform their duties within the limits of funds made available to the task for its purposes. c.  The task force shall organize as soon as practicable after the appointment of a majority of its public members, and the Governor shall select a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among its members.  The chairperson shall appoint a secretary who need not be a member of the task force. d.  The task force shall meet a minimum of three times a year but may meet more often at the call of its chair.  The task force may hold hearings at times and in places it deems appropriate and necessary to fulfill its charge.  The task force shall be entitled to call to its assistance, and avail itself of the services of the employees of, any State, county, or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency as it may require and as may be available to it for its purposes. e.  The Department of Human Services shall maintain oversight of the task force and shall delegate the New Jersey Policy Center on Aging at Rutgers, The State University established pursuant to P.L. 1988, c. 139 (C.52:27D-29.23 et seq.) to provide research and academic support services to the task force as required to carry out its responsibilities. 3.  The purpose of the task force shall be to: a.  act as an advisory body on aging to the Legislature and State departments, agencies, commissions, authorities, and private agencies, including, but not limited to, coordinating research on, identifying resources for, and developing laws, budgets, and administrative rules and regulations relating to, the provision of services to meet the physical or social needs of older persons and to support health aging; b.  develop and implement a ten year, multi-sector plan with clear and measurable data-driven objectives and goals to transform the infrastructure of, and the coordination of service between, State and local departments and agencies to improve the provision of services to older adults and their caregivers in the State of New Jersey, based on national and State best practices, research, and policies, procedures, or initiatives implemented by other states.  The multi-sector plan shall make recommendations to: (1) address age-related demographic changes and their impact on: (a) the States economy, workforce, transportation network, and infrastructure; (b) county, municipal, and local budgets and fiscal policies; (c) State Medicaid, Medicare, and other federal and State programs specifically designed and operated to assist older adults; and (d) other State and federal programs unrelated to those providing services to older adults; (2) study the potential effects of reductions in funding for federal entitlement programs on existing State services and programs for older adults; (3) strengthen existing services and programs to more adequately support and meet the needs of older adults and their caregivers and, where desirable, encourage new programs to meet these needs; (4) improve the quality, accessibility, and availability of long-term care services and supports to enable older people to remain in their homes and communities; (5) protect the financial security, and prevent fraud and the financial exploitation, of older adults; (6) expand the accessibility, availability, and affordability of digital technology for older adults; and (7) address the root causes of health disparities and inequities in the State to advance health equity as it relates to aging and the provision of services to older adults; and c.  identify, with assistance from the public, research topics on healthy aging and other issues that impact older adults in the State, to inform studies the task force may conduct. d.  As used in this act: Multi-sector plan means a comprehensive strategic plan incorporating a blueprint designed to create a coordinated system of high quality services and support to meet the evolving needs of older adults and address the impact demographic aging will have on the entire population of the State of New Jersey. Older adult means a person who is 60 years of age or older. 4.  a.  The task force shall submit the multi-sector plan developed pursuant to section 2 of this act, and a report of any other of its findings and recommendations to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), no later than one year after the task force organizes. b.  The task force shall expire 30 days after the issuance of the multi-sector plan and its report. 5.  This act shall take effect immediately.